Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-8,129
State Athletic Commissioner; jurisdiction; activities covered.

The State Athletic Commissioner shall have sole direction, management, control, and jurisdiction over all professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, and professional sparring matches and exhibitions and all amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, and amateur kickboxing matches and exhibitions to be held within the state, except such as are conducted by universities, colleges, high schools, the military, and recognized amateur associations for contestants under sixteen years of age. No professional boxers, professional mixed martial arts contestants, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts contestants, professional mixed martial arts on ice contestants, professional muay thai contestants, professional kickboxers, professional bare-knuckle boxers, amateur mixed martial arts contestants, amateur muay thai contestants, or amateur kickboxing contestants who have attained the age of sixteen, shall participate in a match or exhibition for a prize or purse, or at which an admission fee is charged, either directly or indirectly, in the form of dues or otherwise, in this state except by a club, association, organization, or person licensed by the commissioner, as provided in section 81-8,130, and in pursuance of a license granted by the commissioner for such match or exhibition under section 81-8,130.01.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 2, p. 1327;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB471, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB869, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB291, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB70, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB635, § 1.

Fight contests, which include kickboxing, mixed martial arts, and submission wrestling, do not qualify as professional wrestling or boxing matches or exhibitions as those terms are used in the statute. The State Athletic Commissioner has jurisdiction over professional wrestling and boxing and has no authority to issue a license for fight contests. Mason v. City of Lincoln, 266 Neb. 399, 665 N.W.2d 600 (2003).